Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,140
Dissolved corporation; books, papers, effects; delivery to trustees; enforcement.

The court shall, upon an application for that purpose, order any officer of such corporation, or any other person having possession of any of the effects, books, or papers of the corporation in any wise necessary for the settlement of its affairs, to deliver up the same to the trustees.

R.S.1867, Code § 723, p. 519;

R.S.1913, § 8347;

C.S.1922, § 9299;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,131;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,140.